tests/runtime/sizelen.sbl
// Test len/lenof/size/sizeof.

externals (stem)

integers (expected_size)

strings (s)

stringescapes {}

define stem as (
  = ''
  $(len == 0) or fail='len empty incorrect'
  $(size == 0) or fail='size empty incorrect'
  = 'test'
  $(len == 4) or fail='len incorrect'
  $(size == 4) or fail='size incorrect'

  $(lenof '' == 0) or fail='lenof empty literal incorrect'
  $(sizeof '' == 0) or fail='sizeof empty literal incorrect'
  $(lenof 'test' == 4) or fail='lenof literal incorrect'
  $(sizeof 'test' == 4) or fail='sizeof literal incorrect'

  $s = ''
  $(lenof s == 0) or fail='lenof empty string variable incorrect'
  $(sizeof s == 0) or fail='sizeof empty string variable incorrect'
  $s = 'test'
  $(lenof s == 4) or fail='lenof string variable incorrect'
  $(sizeof s == 4) or fail='sizeof string variable incorrect'

  // Probe if character representation is UTF-8.
  (
    // UTF-8.
    $(sizeof '{U+00A0}' == 2)  $expected_size = 8
  ) or (
    $(sizeof '{U+00A0}' == 1)  $expected_size = 7
  ) or fail='sizeof U+00A0 unexpected'

  = '{U+00E9}preuve'
  $(len == 7) or fail='Unicode len incorrect'

  $(lenof '{U+00E9}preuve' == 7) or fail='Unicode lenof literal incorrect'

  $s = '{U+00E9}preuve'
  $(lenof s == 7) or fail='Unicode lenof string variable incorrect'

  = '{U+00E9}preuve'
  $(size == expected_size) or fail='Unicode size incorrect'

  $(sizeof '{U+00E9}preuve' == expected_size) or fail='Unicode sizeof literal incorrect'

  $s = '{U+00E9}preuve'
  $(sizeof s == expected_size) or fail='Unicode sizeof string variable incorrect'

  ='ok'
)
